Utah statutes.
63H-1-503.   Use of municipal services revenue.

(1)  The authority may use municipal services revenue to pay for:

(a)  administrative, overhead, legal, and other operating expenses of the authority; and

(b)  municipal services within the project area from which the revenue was collected.

(2)  Unless otherwise provided by agreement between the authority and each county and municipality levying a property tax on property within a project area, the authority shall distribute any remaining municipal services revenue equally among all counties and municipalities that levy a property tax on property within a project area.

